Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-901 to 54-913 shall be known and
may be cited as the Livestock Animal Welfare Act.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB423, § 5.